fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Kitaratarvikkeet: Plektrat akustisen kitaran soittoon; Capot; Plektrat sähkökitaran soittoon; Kitarakotelot ja -keikkakassit; Kitaran osat; Kitaran kostuttimet; Kitarapedaalit; Kitaraplektrat; Kitaran slide-putket; Kitaratelineet; Kitarahihnat; Kitaranvirityskampi; Kitaran kielet; Kitaran virityskoneistot
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 기타 부대용품: 어쿠스틱 기타 픽업; 카포; 전기 기타 픽업; 기타 케이스/패딩 가방; 기타 피팅용품/부품; 기타용 가습기; 기타 페달; 기타 피크; 기타 슬라이드; 기타 스탠드; 기타 스트랩; 기타 스트링 와인더; 기타 줄; 기타 줄감개
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Guitar – tilbehør: Akustisk guitar – pickups; Capoer; Elektrisk guitar – pickups; Guitartasker og gigtasker; Guitartilbehør og -dele; Guitar – fugter; Guitarpedaler; Guitar – plektre; Guitar – sliderør; Guitar – stativer; Guitarremme; Strammere til guitarstrenge; Guitar – strenge; Guitar – tuning
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Kytary – příslušenství: Snímače na akustické kytary; Kapodastry; Snímače na elektrické kytary; Kytarové kufry a gigbagy; Kytarové příslušenství; Kytarové zvlhčovače; Kytarové pedály; Kytarová trsátka; Slide pro kytary; Stojany na kytary; Popruhy ke kytarám; Navíječe kytarových strun; Kytarové struny; Kytarové ladicí mechaniky
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Аксесоари за китара: Пикапи за акустична китара; Каподастри; Пикапи за електрическа китара; Калъфи и чанти за китара; Части и аксесоари за китара; Овлажнители за китара; Педали за китара; Перца за китара; Слайдове за китара; Стойки за китара; Ремъци за китари; Устройства за навиване на струни; Струни за китара; Ключове за настройка на китара
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Accessoires voor gitaren: Pick-ups voor akoestische gitaren; Capo's; Pick-ups voor elektrische gitaren; Koffers en hoezen voor gitaren; Onderdelen voor gitaren; Bevochtigers voor gitaren; Gitaarpedalen; Gitaarplectrums; Gitaarslides; Gitaarstandaards; Gitaarriemen; Snaarspanners voor gitaren; Gitaarsnaren; Stemapparaten voor gitaren
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > ギター用品: アコースティックギター用ピックアップ; カポ; エレキギター用ピックアップ; ギターケース・ギグバッグ; ギター用備品・パーツ; ギター用加湿器; ギターペダル; ギターピック; ギタースライド; ギタースタンド; ギターストラップ; ギター用ストリングワインダー; ギター弦; ギター用ペグ
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Acessórios para guitarra: Captador de violão; Cravelhames; Captador de guitarra elétrica; Estojos e gig bags para guitarra; Acessórios e peças de guitarras; Umidificadores de violão; Pedais para guitarra; Palhetas para guitarra; Slides para guitarra; Suportes para guitarra; Correias para guitarra; Chaves de afinação para guitarras; Cordas para guitarra; Afinadores para guitarras
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > Guitar Accessories: Acoustic Guitar Pickups; Capos; Electric Guitar Pickups; Guitar Cases & Gigbags; Guitar Fittings & Parts; Guitar Humidifiers; Guitar Pedals; Guitar Picks; Guitar Slides; Guitar Stands; Guitar Straps; Guitar String Winders; Guitar Strings; Guitar Tuning Pegs
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Gitarų priedai: Akustinių gitarų garso ėmikliai; Kapodasteriai; Elektrinių gitarų garso ėmikliai; Gitarų dėklai ir krepšiai; Gitarų priedai ir dalys; Gitarų drėkintuvai; Gitarų pedalai; Gitarų mediatoriai; Gitarų slaidai; Gitarų stovai; Gitarų diržai; Gitarų stygų tempimo įrankiai; Gitarų stygos; Gitarų derinimo kuoliukai
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Pribor za gitare: Pickup za akustičnu gitaru; Kapodasteri; Pickup za električnu gitaru; Koferi i koncertne torbe za gitaru; Oprema i dijelovi za gitaru; Ovlaživači za gitare; Pedale za gitaru; Trzalice za gitaru; Slideovi za gitaru; Stalci za gitaru; Remeni za gitaru; Namotači žica; Žice za gitaru; Ključevi za ugađanje gitare
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Gitarrenzubehör: Tonabnehmer für Akustikgitarren; Kapodaster; Tonabnehmer für E-Gitarren; Koffer und Transporttaschen für Gitarren; Gitarrenzubehör & -teile; Gitarrenbefeuchter; Gitarreneffektgeräte; Gitarrenplektren; Gitarren-Slides; Gitarrenständer; Gitarrengurte; Gitarrensaitenspanner; Gitarrensaiten; Gitarrenstimmwirbel
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Accessoires pour guitares: Micros pour guitares acoustiques; Capodastres; Micros pour guitares électriques; Étuis et sacs de transport pour guitares; Pièces pour guitares; Humidificateurs pour guitares; Pédales de guitare; Médiators pour guitares; Bottlenecks pour guitares; Supports pour guitares; Sangles de guitares; Tourne-mécaniques pour guitares; Cordes pour guitares; Chevilles de guitare
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Accessori per chitarra: Pick-up chitarra acustica; Capotasti; Pick-up chitarra elettrica; Custodie e gigbag per chitarra; Componenti e accessori per chitarra; Umidificatori per chitarra; Pedali per chitarra; Plettri per chitarra; Slide per chitarra; Supporti per chitarra; Tracolle per chitarra; Avvolgicorde per chitarra; Corde per chitarra; Accordatori per chitarra
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Dodatki za kitare: Odjemalci zvoka za akustične kitare; Kapodastri; Odjemalci zvoka za električne kitare; Kovčki in torbe za kitare; Pribor in deli za kitaro; Vlažilci za kitare; Kitarski pedali; Trzalice za kitaro; Drsniki za kitare; Stojala za kitare; Pasovi za kitaro; Navijalci za kitarske strune; Kitarske strune; Klini za uglaševanje kitare
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Akcesoria do gitar: Przetworniki do gitar akustycznych; Kapodastery; Przetworniki do gitar elektrycznych; Futerały i pokrowce na gitary; Części i osprzęt do gitar; Środki nawilżające do gitar; Pedały gitarowe; Kostki do gitar; Slidery do gitar; Stojaki na gitary; Paski do gitar; Korbki do nawijania strun; Struny do gitar; Klucze do gitar
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Accesorios para guitarra: Pastillas para guitarra acústica; Cejillas; Pastillas para guitarra eléctrica; Fundas y estuches para guitarra; Piezas y equipamiento para guitarras; Humidificadores de guitarra; Pedales de guitarra; Púas de guitarra; Slides para guitarra; Bases para guitarra; Cintas para guitarra; Manivela para apretar cuerdas de guitarra; Cuerdas de guitarra; Calibradores para guitarras
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > อุปกรณ์กีตาร์: ปิ๊กอัพกีตาร์โปร่ง; คาโป้; ปิ๊กอัพกีตาร์ไฟฟ้า; กล่องและถุงใส่กีตาร์; อุปกรณ์และชิ้นส่วนสำหรับกีตาร์; เครื่องเพิ่มความชื้นให้กีตาร์; แป้นเหยียบเอฟเฟกต์กีตาร์; ปิ๊กกีตาร์; สไลด์กีตาร์; ที่วางกีต้าร์; สายสะพายกีตาร์; ที่ขันสายกีตาร์; สายกีตาร์; ลูกบิดกีตาร์
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Phụ kiện guitar: Thiết bị thu âm ghi-ta hiện đại; Kẹp tăng tông; Pickup cho guitar điện; Hộp & Túi đựng đàn guitar; Bộ phận và phụ kiện đàn ghi-ta; Máy tạo ẩm cho đàn guitar; Bàn đạp đàn guitar; Miếng gảy chơi đàn ghi-ta; Ống trượt chơi guitar; Giá đỡ đàn ghi-ta; Dây đeo đàn guitar; Dụng cụ lên dây đàn ghi-ta; Dây đàn guitar; Khóa đàn guitar
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Acessórios de guitarra: Captadores pickups de guitarra acústica; Transpositores; Captadores pickups de guitarra elétrica; Gigbags e estojos para guitarra; Encaixes e peças de guitarra; Humidificadores de guitarra; Pedais de guitarra; Palhetas de guitarra; Slides de guitarra; Apoios de guitarra; Correias de guitarra; Enroladores de cordas de guitarra; Cordas de guitarra; Carrilhões de afinação de guitarra
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 吉他配件: 原聲吉他拾音器; 移調夾; 電吉他拾音器; 吉他箱/吉他袋; 吉他零件; 吉他加濕器; 吉他踏板; 吉他彈片; 吉他滑音管; 吉他架; 吉他背帶; 吉他弦捲弦器; 吉他弦; 吉他調音釘
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Gitartilbehør: Pickups til akustiske gitarer; Capoer; Pickups til elektriske gitarer; Gitarkasser og -vesker; Gitartilbehør og -deler; Gitarhumidorer; Gitarpedaler; Gitarplektere; Gitarslidere; Gitarstativer; Gitarstropper; Strengestrammere for gitar; Gitarstrenger; Stemmenøkler for gitar
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Gitárkiegészítők: Akusztikus gitár hangszedők; Kápók; Elektromos gitár hangszedők; Gitártokok és -táskák; Gitárszerelvények és -alkatrészek; Gitárpárásítók; Gitárpedálok; Gitárpengetők; Gitárcsúszkák; Gitártartók; Gitárpántok; Gitárhúr-tekercselők; Gitárhúrok; Gitárhangoló szegek
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 吉他配件: 木吉他拾音器; 吉他变调夹; 电吉他拾音器; 吉他盒/琴包; 吉他配件和部件; 吉他加湿器; 吉他踏板; 吉他拨片; 吉他滑棒; 吉他架; 吉他背带; 吉他上弦器; 吉他弦; 吉他卷弦扭
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Accesorii pentru chitară: Doze pentru chitară acustică; Capodastre; Doze pentru chitară electrică; Huse și genți pentru chitară; Accesorii și piese pentru chitară; Umidificatoare pentru chitară; Pedale pentru chitară; Pene pentru chitară; Slide-uri pentru chitară; Stative pentru chitară; Curele pentru chitară; Înfășurătoare coarde de chitară; Coarde de chitară; Cheițe de acordare chitară
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Gitarrtillbehör: Pickups för akustisk gitarr; Capos; Pickups för elektrisk gitarr; Gitarrfodral och spelningsbagar; Gitarrtillbehör och -delar; Gitarrfuktare; Gitarrpedaler; Gitarrplektrum; Gitarrslides; Gitarrställ; Gitarremmar; Gitarrstämskruvar; Gitarrsträngar; Gitarrstämapparater
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Аксессуары для гитар: Звукосниматели для акустических гитар; Каподастры; Звукосниматели для электрогитар; Футляры и чехлы для гитар; Фурнитура и детали для гитар; Увлажнители для гитар; Гитарные педали; Гитарные медиаторы; Гитарные слайды; Стойки для гитар; Ремни для гитар; Вертушки для колков; Гитарные струны; Гитарные колки
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Gitar Aksesuarları: Akustik Gitar Pickup Sistemleri; Kapolar; Elektro Gitar Pickup Sistemleri; Gitar Kılıfları ve Çantaları; Gitar Bağlantı Elemanları ve Parçaları; Gitar Nemlendiriciler; Gitar Pedalları; Gitar Penaları; Gitar Slide Yüzükleri; Gitar Stantları; Gitar Kayışları; Gitar Teli Anahtarları; Gitar Telleri; Gitar Akort Aletleri
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ κιθάρας: Μαγνήτες ακουστικής κιθάρας; Καποτάστα (Capos); Μαγνήτες ηλεκτρικής κιθάρας; Θήκες & μαλακές θήκες κιθάρας; Εξοπλισμός & εξαρτήματα κιθάρας; Υγραντήρες κιθάρας; Πετάλια κιθάρας; Πένες κιθάρας; Σλάιντς κιθάρας; Βάσεις κιθάρας; Ιμάντες κιθάρας; Κουρδιστήρια χορδών κιθάρας; Χορδές κιθάρας; Κλειδιά κουρδίσματος κιθάρας
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre gitaru: Snímače akustickej gitary; Kapodastre; Snímače elektrickej gitary; Gitarové puzdrá a gigbagy; Gitarové príslušenstvo a diely; Gitarové zvlhčovače; Gitarové pedále; Gitarové brnkátka; Gitarové slajdy; Stojany na gitary; Gitarové pásy; Navíjače strún na gitaru; Gitarové struny; Kolíky na ladenie gitary